Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-3715
Hotel;
occupancy; sales tax.

There is hereby imposed an additional
sales tax of one percent upon the total consideration charged for occupancy
of any space furnished by any hotel in this state. The proceeds from such
tax shall be paid to the State Visitors Promotion Cash Fund.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 9;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1253;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 15.
July 1, 2012